Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1008
Body art, defined.

Body art means body piercing, branding, permanent color technology, and tattooing.

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-346.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 270.